Illinois, session 104th, HB4382.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as DJ's Law. 5    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 6changing Sections 6-107 and 6-206 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/6-107)8    Sec. 6-107. Graduated license. 9    (a) The purpose of the Graduated Licensing Program is to 10develop safe and mature driving habits in young, inexperienced 11drivers and reduce or prevent motor vehicle crashes, 12fatalities, and injuries by:13        (1) providing for an increase in the time of practice 14    period before granting permission to obtain a driver's 15    license;16        (2) strengthening driver licensing and testing 17    standards for persons under the age of 21 years;18        (3) sanctioning driving privileges of drivers under 19    age 21 who have committed serious traffic violations or 20    other specified offenses; and21        (4) setting stricter standards to promote the public's 22    health and safety.  HB4382 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    (b) The application of any person under the age of 18 2years, and not legally emancipated, for a driver's license or 3permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of this 4State, shall be accompanied by the written consent of either 5parent of the applicant; otherwise by the guardian having 6custody of the applicant, or in the event there is no parent or 7guardian, then by another responsible adult. The written 8consent must accompany any application for a driver's license 9under this subsection (b), regardless of whether or not the 10required written consent also accompanied the person's 11previous application for an instruction permit. 12    No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 13applicant under 18 years of age, unless the applicant is at 14least 16 years of age and has:15        (1) Held a valid instruction permit for a minimum of 9 16    months.17        (2) Passed an approved driver education course and 18    submits proof of having passed the course as may be 19    required.20        (3) Certification by the parent, legal guardian, or 21    responsible adult that the applicant has had a minimum of 22    50 hours of behind-the-wheel practice time, at least 10 23    hours of which have been at night, and is sufficiently 24    prepared and able to safely operate a motor vehicle.25    (b-1) No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 26applicant who is under 18 years of age and not legally   HB4382 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1emancipated, unless the applicant has graduated from a 2secondary school of this State or any other state, is enrolled 3in a course leading to a State of Illinois High School Diploma, 4has obtained a State of Illinois High School Diploma, is 5enrolled in an elementary or secondary school or college or 6university of this State or any other state and is not a 7chronic or habitual truant as provided in Section 26-2a of the 8School Code, or is receiving home instruction and submits 9proof of meeting any of those requirements at the time of 10application. 11    An applicant under 18 years of age who provides proof 12acceptable to the Secretary that the applicant has resumed 13regular school attendance or home instruction or that his or 14her application was denied in error shall be eligible to 15receive a graduated license if other requirements are met. The 16Secretary shall adopt rules for implementing this subsection 17(b-1). 18    (c) No graduated driver's license or permit shall be 19issued to any applicant under 18 years of age who has committed 20the offense of operating a motor vehicle without a valid 21license or permit in violation of Section 6-101 of this Code or 22a similar out of state offense and no graduated driver's 23license or permit shall be issued to any applicant under 18 24years of age who has committed an offense that would otherwise 25result in a mandatory revocation of a license or permit as 26provided in Section 6-205 of this Code or who has been either   HB4382 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1convicted of or adjudicated a delinquent based upon a 2violation of the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois Controlled 3Substances Act, the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or the 4Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act while 5that individual was in actual physical control of a motor 6vehicle. For purposes of this Section, any person placed on 7probation under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, 8Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 9Section 70 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 10Protection Act shall not be considered convicted. Any person 11found guilty of such an offense, while in actual physical 12control of a motor vehicle, shall have an entry made in the 13court record by the judge that the offense did occur while the 14person was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle and 15order the clerk of the court to report the violation to the 16Secretary of State as such.17    (d) No graduated driver's license shall be issued for 9 18months to any applicant under the age of 18 years who has 19committed and subsequently been convicted of an offense 20against traffic regulations governing the movement of 21vehicles, any violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of 22this Code, or who has received a disposition of court 23supervision for a violation of Section 6-20 of the Illinois 24Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar provision of a local 25ordinance.26    (e) No graduated driver's license holder under the age of   HB4382 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b118 years shall operate any motor vehicle, except a motor 2driven cycle or motorcycle, with more than one passenger in 3the front seat of the motor vehicle and no more passengers in 4the back seats than the number of available seat safety belts 5as set forth in Section 12-603 of this Code. If a graduated 6driver's license holder over the age of 18 committed an 7offense against traffic regulations governing the movement of 8vehicles or any violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 9of this Code in the 6 months prior to the graduated driver's 10license holder's 18th birthday, and was subsequently convicted 11of the violation, the provisions of this paragraph shall 12continue to apply until such time as a period of 6 consecutive 13months has elapsed without an additional violation and 14subsequent conviction of an offense against traffic 15regulations governing the movement of vehicles or any 16violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of this Code. 17    (f) (Blank). 18    (g) If a graduated driver's license holder is under the 19age of 18 when he or she receives the license, for the first 12 20months he or she holds the license or until he or she reaches 21the age of 18, whichever occurs sooner, the graduated license 22holder may not operate a motor vehicle with more than one 23passenger in the vehicle who is under the age of 20, unless any 24additional passenger or passengers are siblings, 25step-siblings, children, or stepchildren of the driver. If a 26graduated driver's license holder is convicted of violating   HB4382 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1this subsection and that violation results in bodily harm or 2permanent disability to another, then the holder's graduated 3driver's license shall be suspended for 6 months. If a 4graduated driver's license holder committed an offense against 5traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles or any 6violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of this Code 7during the first 12 months the license is held and 8subsequently is convicted of the violation, the provisions of 9this paragraph shall remain in effect until such time as a 10period of 6 consecutive months has elapsed without an 11additional violation and subsequent conviction of an offense 12against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 13or any violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of this 14Code. If a graduated driver's license holder's license is 15suspended or revoked for a violation of this subsection that 16results in bodily harm or permanent disability to another, the 17provisions of this subsection shall resume upon termination of 18the suspension or revocation period and shall remain in effect 19either until a period of 6 consecutive months has elapsed 20without an additional violation under this subsection or until 21the graduated driver's license holder turns 18, whichever 22occurs later, notwithstanding any other provision of this 23subsection. 24    (h) It shall be an offense for a person that is age 15, but 25under age 20, to be a passenger in a vehicle operated by a 26driver holding a graduated driver's license during the first   HB4382 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b112 months the driver holds the license or until the driver 2reaches the age of 18, whichever occurs sooner, if another 3passenger under the age of 20 is present, excluding a sibling, 4step-sibling, child, or step-child of the driver. 5    (i) No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 6applicant under the age of 18 years if the applicant has been 7issued a traffic citation for which a disposition has not been 8rendered at the time of application. 9(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 10103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 11    (625 ILCS 5/6-206)12    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-400)13    Sec. 6-206. Discretionary authority to suspend or revoke 14license or permit; right to a hearing.15    (a) The Secretary of State is authorized to suspend or 16revoke the driving privileges of any person without 17preliminary hearing upon a showing of the person's records or 18other sufficient evidence that the person:19        1. Has committed an offense for which mandatory 20    revocation of a driver's license or permit is required 21    upon conviction;22        2. Has been convicted of not less than 3 offenses 23    against traffic regulations governing the movement of 24    vehicles committed within any 12-month period. No 25    revocation or suspension shall be entered more than 6   HB4382 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    months after the date of last conviction;2        3. Has been repeatedly involved as a driver in motor 3    vehicle collisions or has been repeatedly convicted of 4    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 5    movement of traffic, to a degree that indicates lack of 6    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 7    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 8    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 9    highway;10        4. Has by the unlawful operation of a motor vehicle 11    caused or contributed to a crash resulting in injury 12    requiring immediate professional treatment in a medical 13    facility or doctor's office to any person, except that any 14    suspension or revocation imposed by the Secretary of State 15    under the provisions of this subsection shall start no 16    later than 6 months after being convicted of violating a 17    law or ordinance regulating the movement of traffic, which 18    violation is related to the crash, or shall start not more 19    than one year after the date of the crash, whichever date 20    occurs later;21        5. Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a 22    driver's license, identification card, or permit;23        6. Has been lawfully convicted of an offense or 24    offenses in another state, including the authorization 25    contained in Section 6-203.1, which if committed within 26    this State would be grounds for suspension or revocation;  HB4382 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        7. Has refused or failed to submit to an examination 2    provided for by Section 6-207 or has failed to pass the 3    examination;4        8. Is ineligible for a driver's license or permit 5    under the provisions of Section 6-103;6        9. Has made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 7    material fact or has used false information or 8    identification in any application for a license, 9    identification card, or permit;10        10. Has possessed, displayed, or attempted to 11    fraudulently use any license, identification card, or 12    permit not issued to the person;13        11. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of 14    this State when the person's driving privilege or 15    privilege to obtain a driver's license or permit was 16    revoked or suspended unless the operation was authorized 17    by a monitoring device driving permit, judicial driving 18    permit issued prior to January 1, 2009, probationary 19    license to drive, or restricted driving permit issued 20    under this Code;21        12. Has submitted to any portion of the application 22    process for another person or has obtained the services of 23    another person to submit to any portion of the application 24    process for the purpose of obtaining a license, 25    identification card, or permit for some other person;26        13. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of   HB4382 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    this State when the person's driver's license or permit 2    was invalid under the provisions of Sections 6-107.1 and 3    6-110;4        14. Has committed a violation of Section 6-301, 5    6-301.1, or 6-301.2 of this Code, or Section 14, 14A, or 6    14B of the Illinois Identification Card Act or a similar 7    offense in another state if, at the time of the offense, 8    the person held an Illinois driver's license or 9    identification card;10        15. Has been convicted of violating Section 21-2 of 11    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 12    relating to criminal trespass to vehicles if the person 13    exercised actual physical control over the vehicle during 14    the commission of the offense, in which case the 15    suspension shall be for one year;16        16. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-204 of 17    this Code relating to fleeing from a peace officer;18        17. Has refused to submit to a test, or tests, as 19    required under Section 11-501.1 of this Code and the 20    person has not sought a hearing as provided for in Section 21    11-501.1;22        18. (Blank);23        19. Has committed a violation of paragraph (a) or (b) 24    of Section 6-101 relating to driving without a driver's 25    license;26        20. Has been convicted of violating Section 6-104   HB4382 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    relating to classification of driver's license;2        21. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-402 of 3    this Code relating to leaving the scene of a crash 4    resulting in damage to a vehicle in excess of $1,000, in 5    which case the suspension shall be for one year;6        22. Has used a motor vehicle in violating paragraph 7    (3), (4), (7), or (9) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of 8    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 9    relating to unlawful possession of weapons, in which case 10    the suspension shall be for one year;11        23. Has, as a driver, been convicted of committing a 12    violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this Code 13    for a second or subsequent time within one year of a 14    similar violation;15        24. Has been convicted by a court-martial or punished 16    by non-judicial punishment by military authorities of the 17    United States at a military installation in Illinois or in 18    another state of or for a traffic-related offense that is 19    the same as or similar to an offense specified under 20    Section 6-205 or 6-206 of this Code;21        25. Has permitted any form of identification to be 22    used by another in the application process in order to 23    obtain or attempt to obtain a license, identification 24    card, or permit;25        26. Has altered or attempted to alter a license or has 26    possessed an altered license, identification card, or   HB4382 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    permit;2        27. (Blank);3        28. Has been convicted for a first time of the illegal 4    possession, while operating or in actual physical control, 5    as a driver, of a motor vehicle, of any controlled 6    substance prohibited under the Illinois Controlled 7    Substances Act, any cannabis prohibited under the Cannabis 8    Control Act, or any methamphetamine prohibited under the 9    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in 10    which case the person's driving privileges shall be 11    suspended for one year. Any defendant found guilty of this 12    offense while operating a motor vehicle shall have an 13    entry made in the court record by the presiding judge that 14    this offense did occur while the defendant was operating a 15    motor vehicle and order the clerk of the court to report 16    the violation to the Secretary of State;17        29. Has been convicted of the following offenses that 18    were committed while the person was operating or in actual 19    physical control, as a driver, of a motor vehicle: 20    criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault 21    of a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal 22    sexual abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, juvenile 23    pimping, soliciting for a sexually exploited child, 24    promoting commercial sexual exploitation of a child as 25    described in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) of 26    Section 11-14.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the   HB4382 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    Criminal Code of 2012, and the manufacture, sale or 2    delivery of controlled substances or instruments used for 3    illegal drug use or abuse in which case the driver's 4    driving privileges shall be suspended for one year;5        30. Has been convicted a second or subsequent time for 6    any combination of the offenses named in paragraph 29 of 7    this subsection, in which case the person's driving 8    privileges shall be suspended for 5 years;9        31. Has refused to submit to a test as required by 10    Section 11-501.6 of this Code or Section 5-16c of the Boat 11    Registration and Safety Act or has submitted to a test 12    resulting in an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or 13    any amount of a drug, substance, or compound resulting 14    from the unlawful use or consumption of cannabis as listed 15    in the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled substance as 16    listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 17    intoxicating compound as listed in the Use of Intoxicating 18    Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in the 19    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in 20    which case the penalty shall be as prescribed in Section 21    6-208.1;22        32. Has been convicted of Section 24-1.2 of the 23    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 24    relating to the aggravated discharge of a firearm if the 25    offender was located in a motor vehicle at the time the 26    firearm was discharged, in which case the suspension shall   HB4382 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    be for 3 years;2        33. Has as a driver, who was less than 21 years of age 3    on the date of the offense, been convicted a first time of 4    a violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this 5    Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;6        34. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.5 of 7    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;8        35. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.6 of 9    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;10        36. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 11    and has been convicted of not less than 2 offenses against 12    traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 13    committed within any 24-month period. No revocation or 14    suspension shall be entered more than 6 months after the 15    date of last conviction;16        37. Has committed a violation of subsection (c) of 17    Section 11-907 of this Code that resulted in damage to the 18    property of another or the death or injury of another;19        38. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 6-20 20    of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar provision of 21    a local ordinance and the person was an occupant of a motor 22    vehicle at the time of the violation;23        39. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 24    Section 11-1201 of this Code;25        40. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 26    Section 11-908 of this Code;  HB4382 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        41. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 2    Section 11-605.1 of this Code, a similar provision of a 3    local ordinance, or a similar violation in any other state 4    within 2 years of the date of the previous violation, in 5    which case the suspension shall be for 90 days;6        42. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 7    Section 11-1301.3 of this Code or a similar provision of a 8    local ordinance; 9        43. Has received a disposition of court supervision 10    for a violation of subsection (a), (d), or (e) of Section 11    6-20 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar 12    provision of a local ordinance and the person was an 13    occupant of a motor vehicle at the time of the violation, 14    in which case the suspension shall be for a period of 3 15    months; 16        44. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 17    and has been convicted of an offense against traffic 18    regulations governing the movement of vehicles after 19    having previously had his or her driving privileges 20    suspended or revoked pursuant to subparagraph 36 of this 21    Section;22        45. Has, in connection with or during the course of a 23    formal hearing conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code: 24    (i) committed perjury; (ii) submitted fraudulent or 25    falsified documents; (iii) submitted documents that have 26    been materially altered; or (iv) submitted, as his or her   HB4382 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    own, documents that were in fact prepared or composed for 2    another person;3        46. Has committed a violation of subsection (j) of 4    Section 3-413 of this Code;5        47. Has committed a violation of subsection (a) of 6    Section 11-502.1 of this Code; 7        48. Has submitted a falsified or altered medical 8    examiner's certificate to the Secretary of State or 9    provided false information to obtain a medical examiner's 10    certificate; 11        49. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 12    11-1002 or 11-1002.5 that resulted in a Type A injury to 13    another, in which case the driving privileges of the 14    person shall be suspended for 12 months; 15        50. Has committed a violation of subsection (b-5) of 16    Section 12-610.2 that resulted in great bodily harm, 17    permanent disability, or disfigurement, in which case the 18    driving privileges of the person shall be suspended for 12 19    months;20        51. Has committed a violation of Section 10-15 Of the 21    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a similar provision of 22    a local ordinance while in a motor vehicle; or23        52. Has committed a violation of subsection (b) of 24    Section 10-20 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a 25    similar provision of a local ordinance.26    For purposes of paragraphs 5, 9, 10, 12, 14, 19, 25, 26,   HB4382 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1and 27 of this subsection, license means any driver's license, 2any traffic ticket issued when the person's driver's license 3is deposited in lieu of bail, a suspension notice issued by the 4Secretary of State, a duplicate or corrected driver's license, 5a probationary driver's license, or a temporary driver's 6license.7    (b) If any conviction forming the basis of a suspension or 8revocation authorized under this Section is appealed, the 9Secretary of State may rescind or withhold the entry of the 10order of suspension or revocation, as the case may be, 11provided that a certified copy of a stay order of a court is 12filed with the Secretary of State. If the conviction is 13affirmed on appeal, the date of the conviction shall relate 14back to the time the original judgment of conviction was 15entered and the 6-month limitation prescribed shall not apply. 16    (c) 1. Upon suspending or revoking the driver's license or 17permit of any person as authorized in this Section, the 18Secretary of State shall immediately notify the person in 19writing of the revocation or suspension. The notice to be 20deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, to the 21last known address of the person.22    2. If the Secretary of State suspends the driver's license 23of a person under subsection 2 of paragraph (a) of this 24Section, a person's privilege to operate a vehicle as an 25occupation shall not be suspended, provided an affidavit is 26properly completed, the appropriate fee received, and a permit   HB4382 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1issued prior to the effective date of the suspension, unless 5 2offenses were committed, at least 2 of which occurred while 3operating a commercial vehicle in connection with the driver's 4regular occupation. All other driving privileges shall be 5suspended by the Secretary of State. Any driver prior to 6operating a vehicle for occupational purposes only must submit 7the affidavit on forms to be provided by the Secretary of State 8setting forth the facts of the person's occupation. The 9affidavit shall also state the number of offenses committed 10while operating a vehicle in connection with the driver's 11regular occupation. The affidavit shall be accompanied by the 12driver's license. Upon receipt of a properly completed 13affidavit, the Secretary of State shall issue the driver a 14permit to operate a vehicle in connection with the driver's 15regular occupation only. Unless the permit is issued by the 16Secretary of State prior to the date of suspension, the 17privilege to drive any motor vehicle shall be suspended as set 18forth in the notice that was mailed under this Section. If an 19affidavit is received subsequent to the effective date of this 20suspension, a permit may be issued for the remainder of the 21suspension period.22    The provisions of this subparagraph shall not apply to any 23driver required to possess a CDL for the purpose of operating a 24commercial motor vehicle.25    Any person who falsely states any fact in the affidavit 26required herein shall be guilty of perjury under Section 6-302   HB4382 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1and upon conviction thereof shall have all driving privileges 2revoked without further rights.3    3. At the conclusion of a hearing under Section 2-118 of 4this Code, the Secretary of State shall either rescind or 5continue an order of revocation or shall substitute an order 6of suspension; or, good cause appearing therefor, rescind, 7continue, change, or extend the order of suspension. If the 8Secretary of State does not rescind the order, the Secretary 9may upon application, to relieve undue hardship (as defined by 10the rules of the Secretary of State), issue a restricted 11driving permit granting the privilege of driving a motor 12vehicle between the petitioner's residence and petitioner's 13place of employment or within the scope of the petitioner's 14employment-related duties, or to allow the petitioner to 15transport himself or herself, or a family member of the 16petitioner's household to a medical facility, to receive 17necessary medical care, to allow the petitioner to transport 18himself or herself to and from alcohol or drug remedial or 19rehabilitative activity recommended by a licensed service 20provider, or to allow the petitioner to transport himself or 21herself or a family member of the petitioner's household to 22classes, as a student, at an accredited educational 23institution, or to allow the petitioner to transport children, 24elderly persons, or persons with disabilities who do not hold 25driving privileges and are living in the petitioner's 26household to and from day care daycare. The petitioner must   HB4382 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1demonstrate that no alternative means of transportation is 2reasonably available and that the petitioner will not endanger 3the public safety or welfare.4        (A) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 5    suspended due to 2 or more convictions of violating 6    Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a 7    local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense, or 8    Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 9    Code of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 10    recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 11    out-of-state offense, or a combination of these offenses, 12    arising out of separate occurrences, that person, if 13    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a 14    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 15    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.16        (B) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 17    suspended 2 or more times due to any combination of:18            (i) a single conviction of violating Section 19        11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 20        ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense or Section 21        9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 22        of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 23        recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 24        out-of-state offense; or25            (ii) a statutory summary suspension or revocation 26        under Section 11-501.1; or  HB4382 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1            (iii) a suspension under Section 6-203.1; 2    arising out of separate occurrences; that person, if 3    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a 4    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 5    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.6        (B-5) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 7    suspended due to a conviction for a violation of 8    subparagraph (C) or (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) 9    of Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a 10    local ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, that 11    person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not 12    operate a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an 13    ignition interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1. 14        (C) The person issued a permit conditioned upon the 15    use of an ignition interlock device must pay to the 16    Secretary of State DUI Administration Fund an amount not 17    to exceed $30 per month. The Secretary shall establish by 18    rule the amount and the procedures, terms, and conditions 19    relating to these fees.20        (D) If the restricted driving permit is issued for 21    employment purposes, then the prohibition against 22    operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an 23    ignition interlock device does not apply to the operation 24    of an occupational vehicle owned or leased by that 25    person's employer when used solely for employment 26    purposes. For any person who, within a 5-year period, is   HB4382 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    convicted of a second or subsequent offense under Section 2    11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a local 3    ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, this employment 4    exemption does not apply until either a one-year period 5    has elapsed during which that person had his or her 6    driving privileges revoked or a one-year period has 7    elapsed during which that person had a restricted driving 8    permit which required the use of an ignition interlock 9    device on every motor vehicle owned or operated by that 10    person.11        (E) In each case the Secretary may issue a restricted 12    driving permit for a period deemed appropriate, except 13    that all permits shall expire no later than 2 years from 14    the date of issuance. A restricted driving permit issued 15    under this Section shall be subject to cancellation, 16    revocation, and suspension by the Secretary of State in 17    like manner and for like cause as a driver's license 18    issued under this Code may be cancelled, revoked, or 19    suspended; except that a conviction upon one or more 20    offenses against laws or ordinances regulating the 21    movement of traffic shall be deemed sufficient cause for 22    the revocation, suspension, or cancellation of a 23    restricted driving permit. The Secretary of State may, as 24    a condition to the issuance of a restricted driving 25    permit, require the applicant to participate in a 26    designated driver remedial or rehabilitative program. The   HB4382 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    Secretary of State is authorized to cancel a restricted 2    driving permit if the permit holder does not successfully 3    complete the program.4        (F) A person subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 5    of subsection (b) of Section 6-208 of this Code may make 6    application for a restricted driving permit at a hearing 7    conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code after the 8    expiration of 5 years from the effective date of the most 9    recent revocation or after 5 years from the date of 10    release from a period of imprisonment resulting from a 11    conviction of the most recent offense, whichever is later, 12    provided the person, in addition to all other requirements 13    of the Secretary, shows by clear and convincing evidence: 14            (i) a minimum of 3 years of uninterrupted 15        abstinence from alcohol and the unlawful use or 16        consumption of cannabis under the Cannabis Control 17        Act, a controlled substance under the Illinois 18        Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating compound 19        under the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or 20        methamphetamine under the Methamphetamine Control and 21        Community Protection Act; and22            (ii) the successful completion of any 23        rehabilitative treatment and involvement in any 24        ongoing rehabilitative activity that may be 25        recommended by a properly licensed service provider 26        according to an assessment of the person's alcohol or   HB4382 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        drug use under Section 11-501.01 of this Code. 2        In determining whether an applicant is eligible for a 3    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F), the 4    Secretary may consider any relevant evidence, including, 5    but not limited to, testimony, affidavits, records, and 6    the results of regular alcohol or drug tests. Persons 7    subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection (b) 8    of Section 6-208 of this Code and who have been convicted 9    of more than one violation of paragraph (3), paragraph 10    (4), or paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 11-501 11    of this Code shall not be eligible to apply for a 12    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F). 13        A restricted driving permit issued under this 14    subparagraph (F) shall provide that the holder may only 15    operate motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock 16    device as required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) 17    of Section 6-205 of this Code and subparagraph (A) of 18    paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of this Section. The 19    Secretary may revoke a restricted driving permit or amend 20    the conditions of a restricted driving permit issued under 21    this subparagraph (F) if the holder operates a vehicle 22    that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device, or 23    for any other reason authorized under this Code. 24        A restricted driving permit issued under this 25    subparagraph (F) shall be revoked, and the holder barred 26    from applying for or being issued a restricted driving   HB4382 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    permit in the future, if the holder is convicted of a 2    violation of Section 11-501 of this Code, a similar 3    provision of a local ordinance, or a similar offense in 4    another state. 5    (c-3) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 6subsection (a), reports received by the Secretary of State 7under this Section shall, except during the actual time the 8suspension is in effect, be privileged information and for use 9only by the courts, police officers, prosecuting authorities, 10the driver licensing administrator of any other state, the 11Secretary of State, or the parent or legal guardian of a driver 12under the age of 18. However, beginning January 1, 2008, if the 13person is a CDL holder, the suspension shall also be made 14available to the driver licensing administrator of any other 15state, the U.S. Department of Transportation, and the affected 16driver or motor carrier or prospective motor carrier upon 17request. 18    (c-4) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 19subsection (a), the Secretary of State shall notify the person 20by mail that his or her driving privileges and driver's 21license will be suspended one month after the date of the 22mailing of the notice. 23    (c-5) The Secretary of State may, as a condition of the 24reissuance of a driver's license or permit to an applicant 25whose driver's license or permit has been suspended before he 26or she reached the age of 21 years pursuant to any of the   HB4382 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1provisions of this Section, require the applicant to 2participate in a driver remedial education course and be 3retested under Section 6-109 of this Code.4    (d) This Section is subject to the provisions of the 5Driver License Compact.6    (e) The Secretary of State shall not issue a restricted 7driving permit to a person under the age of 16 years whose 8driving privileges have been suspended or revoked under any 9provisions of this Code.10    (f) In accordance with 49 CFR 384, the Secretary of State 11may not issue a restricted driving permit for the operation of 12a commercial motor vehicle to a person holding a CDL whose 13driving privileges have been suspended, revoked, cancelled, or 14disqualified under any provisions of this Code.15(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-749, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, eff. 177-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1071, 18eff. 7-1-25; revised 10-27-25.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-400)20    Sec. 6-206. Discretionary authority to suspend or revoke 21license or permit; right to a hearing.22    (a) The Secretary of State is authorized to suspend or 23revoke the driving privileges of any person without 24preliminary hearing upon a showing of the person's records or 25other sufficient evidence that the person:  HB4382 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        1. Has committed an offense for which mandatory 2    revocation of a driver's license or permit is required 3    upon conviction;4        2. Has been convicted of not less than 3 offenses 5    against traffic regulations governing the movement of 6    vehicles committed within any 12-month period. No 7    revocation or suspension shall be entered more than 6 8    months after the date of last conviction;9        3. Has been repeatedly involved as a driver in motor 10    vehicle collisions or has been repeatedly convicted of 11    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 12    movement of traffic, to a degree that indicates lack of 13    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 14    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 15    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 16    highway;17        4. Has by the unlawful operation of a motor vehicle 18    caused or contributed to a crash resulting in injury 19    requiring immediate professional treatment in a medical 20    facility or doctor's office to any person, except that any 21    suspension or revocation imposed by the Secretary of State 22    under the provisions of this subsection shall start no 23    later than 6 months after being convicted of violating a 24    law or ordinance regulating the movement of traffic, which 25    violation is related to the crash, or shall start not more 26    than one year after the date of the crash, whichever date   HB4382 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    occurs later;2        5. Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a 3    driver's license, identification card, or permit;4        6. Has been lawfully convicted of an offense or 5    offenses in another state, including the authorization 6    contained in Section 6-203.1, which if committed within 7    this State would be grounds for suspension or revocation;8        7. Has refused or failed to submit to an examination 9    provided for by Section 6-207 or has failed to pass the 10    examination;11        8. Is ineligible for a driver's license or permit 12    under the provisions of Section 6-103;13        9. Has made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 14    material fact or has used false information or 15    identification in any application for a license, 16    identification card, or permit;17        10. Has possessed, displayed, or attempted to 18    fraudulently use any license, identification card, or 19    permit not issued to the person;20        11. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of 21    this State when the person's driving privilege or 22    privilege to obtain a driver's license or permit was 23    revoked or suspended unless the operation was authorized 24    by a monitoring device driving permit, judicial driving 25    permit issued prior to January 1, 2009, probationary 26    license to drive, or restricted driving permit issued   HB4382 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    under this Code;2        12. Has submitted to any portion of the application 3    process for another person or has obtained the services of 4    another person to submit to any portion of the application 5    process for the purpose of obtaining a license, 6    identification card, or permit for some other person;7        13. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of 8    this State when the person's driver's license or permit 9    was invalid under the provisions of Sections 6-107.1 and 10    6-110;11        14. Has committed a violation of Section 6-301, 12    6-301.1, or 6-301.2 of this Code, or Section 14, 14A, or 13    14B of the Illinois Identification Card Act or a similar 14    offense in another state if, at the time of the offense, 15    the person held an Illinois driver's license or 16    identification card;17        15. Has been convicted of violating Section 21-2 of 18    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 19    relating to criminal trespass to vehicles if the person 20    exercised actual physical control over the vehicle during 21    the commission of the offense, in which case the 22    suspension shall be for one year;23        16. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-204 of 24    this Code relating to fleeing from a peace officer;25        17. Has refused to submit to a test, or tests, as 26    required under Section 11-501.1 of this Code and the   HB4382 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    person has not sought a hearing as provided for in Section 2    11-501.1;3        18. (Blank);4        19. Has committed a violation of paragraph (a) or (b) 5    of Section 6-101 relating to driving without a driver's 6    license;7        20. Has been convicted of violating Section 6-104 8    relating to classification of driver's license;9        21. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-402 of 10    this Code relating to leaving the scene of a crash 11    resulting in damage to a vehicle in excess of $1,000, in 12    which case the suspension shall be for one year;13        22. Has used a motor vehicle in violating paragraph 14    (3), (4), (7), or (9) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of 15    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 16    relating to unlawful possession of weapons, in which case 17    the suspension shall be for one year;18        23. Has, as a driver, been convicted of committing a 19    violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this Code 20    for a second or subsequent time within one year of a 21    similar violation;22        24. Has been convicted by a court-martial or punished 23    by non-judicial punishment by military authorities of the 24    United States at a military installation in Illinois or in 25    another state of or for a traffic-related offense that is 26    the same as or similar to an offense specified under   HB4382 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    Section 6-205 or 6-206 of this Code;2        25. Has permitted any form of identification to be 3    used by another in the application process in order to 4    obtain or attempt to obtain a license, identification 5    card, or permit;6        26. Has altered or attempted to alter a license or has 7    possessed an altered license, identification card, or 8    permit;9        27. (Blank);10        28. Has been convicted for a first time of the illegal 11    possession, while operating or in actual physical control, 12    as a driver, of a motor vehicle, of any controlled 13    substance prohibited under the Illinois Controlled 14    Substances Act, any cannabis prohibited under the Cannabis 15    Control Act, or any methamphetamine prohibited under the 16    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in 17    which case the person's driving privileges shall be 18    suspended for one year. Any defendant found guilty of this 19    offense while operating a motor vehicle shall have an 20    entry made in the court record by the presiding judge that 21    this offense did occur while the defendant was operating a 22    motor vehicle and order the clerk of the court to report 23    the violation to the Secretary of State;24        29. Has been convicted of the following offenses that 25    were committed while the person was operating or in actual 26    physical control, as a driver, of a motor vehicle:   HB4382 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault 2    of a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal 3    sexual abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, juvenile 4    pimping, soliciting for a sexually exploited child, 5    promoting commercial sexual exploitation of a child as 6    described in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) of 7    Section 11-14.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8    Criminal Code of 2012, and the manufacture, sale or 9    delivery of controlled substances or instruments used for 10    illegal drug use or abuse in which case the driver's 11    driving privileges shall be suspended for one year;12        30. Has been convicted a second or subsequent time for 13    any combination of the offenses named in paragraph 29 of 14    this subsection, in which case the person's driving 15    privileges shall be suspended for 5 years;16        31. Has refused to submit to a test as required by 17    Section 11-501.6 of this Code or Section 5-16c of the Boat 18    Registration and Safety Act or has submitted to a test 19    resulting in an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or 20    any amount of a drug, substance, or compound resulting 21    from the unlawful use or consumption of cannabis as listed 22    in the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled substance as 23    listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 24    intoxicating compound as listed in the Use of Intoxicating 25    Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in the 26    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in   HB4382 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    which case the penalty shall be as prescribed in Section 2    6-208.1;3        32. Has been convicted of Section 24-1.2 of the 4    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 5    relating to the aggravated discharge of a firearm if the 6    offender was located in a motor vehicle at the time the 7    firearm was discharged, in which case the suspension shall 8    be for 3 years;9        33. Has as a driver, who was less than 21 years of age 10    on the date of the offense, been convicted a first time of 11    a violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this 12    Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;13        34. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.5 of 14    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;15        35. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.6 of 16    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;17        36. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 18    and has been convicted of not less than 2 offenses against 19    traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 20    committed within any 24-month period. No revocation or 21    suspension shall be entered more than 6 months after the 22    date of last conviction;23        37. Has committed a violation of subsection (c), 24    (c-5), or (c-10) of Section 11-907 of this Code that 25    resulted in damage to the property of another or the death 26    or injury of another;  HB4382 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        38. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 6-20 2    of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar provision of 3    a local ordinance and the person was an occupant of a motor 4    vehicle at the time of the violation;5        39. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 6    Section 11-1201 of this Code;7        40. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 8    Section 11-908 of this Code;9        41. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 10    Section 11-605.1 of this Code, a similar provision of a 11    local ordinance, or a similar violation in any other state 12    within 2 years of the date of the previous violation, in 13    which case the suspension shall be for 90 days;14        42. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 15    Section 11-1301.3 of this Code or a similar provision of a 16    local ordinance; 17        43. Has received a disposition of court supervision 18    for a violation of subsection (a), (d), or (e) of Section 19    6-20 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar 20    provision of a local ordinance and the person was an 21    occupant of a motor vehicle at the time of the violation, 22    in which case the suspension shall be for a period of 3 23    months; 24        44. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 25    and has been convicted of an offense against traffic 26    regulations governing the movement of vehicles after   HB4382 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    having previously had his or her driving privileges 2    suspended or revoked pursuant to subparagraph 36 of this 3    Section;4        45. Has, in connection with or during the course of a 5    formal hearing conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code: 6    (i) committed perjury; (ii) submitted fraudulent or 7    falsified documents; (iii) submitted documents that have 8    been materially altered; or (iv) submitted, as his or her 9    own, documents that were in fact prepared or composed for 10    another person;11        46. Has committed a violation of subsection (j) of 12    Section 3-413 of this Code;13        47. Has committed a violation of subsection (a) of 14    Section 11-502.1 of this Code; 15        48. Has submitted a falsified or altered medical 16    examiner's certificate to the Secretary of State or 17    provided false information to obtain a medical examiner's 18    certificate; 19        49. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 20    11-1002 or 11-1002.5 that resulted in a Type A injury to 21    another, in which case the driving privileges of the 22    person shall be suspended for 12 months; 23        50. Has committed a violation of subsection (b-5) of 24    Section 12-610.2 that resulted in great bodily harm, 25    permanent disability, or disfigurement, in which case the 26    driving privileges of the person shall be suspended for 12   HB4382 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    months;2        51. Has committed a violation of Section 10-15 Of the 3    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a similar provision of 4    a local ordinance while in a motor vehicle; or5        52. Has committed a violation of subsection (b) of 6    Section 10-20 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a 7    similar provision of a local ordinance; or .8        53. Has been convicted of a violation of subsection 9    (g) of Section 6-107 of this Code that resulted in bodily 10    harm or permanent disability to another. 11    For purposes of paragraphs 5, 9, 10, 12, 14, 19, 25, 26, 12and 27 of this subsection, license means any driver's license, 13any traffic ticket issued when the person's driver's license 14is deposited in lieu of bail, a suspension notice issued by the 15Secretary of State, a duplicate or corrected driver's license, 16a probationary driver's license, or a temporary driver's 17license.18    (b) If any conviction forming the basis of a suspension or 19revocation authorized under this Section is appealed, the 20Secretary of State may rescind or withhold the entry of the 21order of suspension or revocation, as the case may be, 22provided that a certified copy of a stay order of a court is 23filed with the Secretary of State. If the conviction is 24affirmed on appeal, the date of the conviction shall relate 25back to the time the original judgment of conviction was 26entered and the 6-month limitation prescribed shall not apply.   HB4382 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    (c) 1. Upon suspending or revoking the driver's license or 2permit of any person as authorized in this Section, the 3Secretary of State shall immediately notify the person in 4writing of the revocation or suspension. The notice to be 5deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, to the 6last known address of the person.7    2. If the Secretary of State suspends the driver's license 8of a person under subsection 2 of paragraph (a) of this 9Section, a person's privilege to operate a vehicle as an 10occupation shall not be suspended, provided an affidavit is 11properly completed, the appropriate fee received, and a permit 12issued prior to the effective date of the suspension, unless 5 13offenses were committed, at least 2 of which occurred while 14operating a commercial vehicle in connection with the driver's 15regular occupation. All other driving privileges shall be 16suspended by the Secretary of State. Any driver prior to 17operating a vehicle for occupational purposes only must submit 18the affidavit on forms to be provided by the Secretary of State 19setting forth the facts of the person's occupation. The 20affidavit shall also state the number of offenses committed 21while operating a vehicle in connection with the driver's 22regular occupation. The affidavit shall be accompanied by the 23driver's license. Upon receipt of a properly completed 24affidavit, the Secretary of State shall issue the driver a 25permit to operate a vehicle in connection with the driver's 26regular occupation only. Unless the permit is issued by the   HB4382 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1Secretary of State prior to the date of suspension, the 2privilege to drive any motor vehicle shall be suspended as set 3forth in the notice that was mailed under this Section. If an 4affidavit is received subsequent to the effective date of this 5suspension, a permit may be issued for the remainder of the 6suspension period.7    The provisions of this subparagraph shall not apply to any 8driver required to possess a CDL for the purpose of operating a 9commercial motor vehicle.10    Any person who falsely states any fact in the affidavit 11required herein shall be guilty of perjury under Section 6-302 12and upon conviction thereof shall have all driving privileges 13revoked without further rights.14    3. At the conclusion of a hearing under Section 2-118 of 15this Code, the Secretary of State shall either rescind or 16continue an order of revocation or shall substitute an order 17of suspension; or, good cause appearing therefor, rescind, 18continue, change, or extend the order of suspension. If the 19Secretary of State does not rescind the order, the Secretary 20may upon application, to relieve undue hardship (as defined by 21the rules of the Secretary of State), issue a restricted 22driving permit granting the privilege of driving a motor 23vehicle between the petitioner's residence and petitioner's 24place of employment or within the scope of the petitioner's 25employment-related duties, or to allow the petitioner to 26transport himself or herself, or a family member of the   HB4382 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1petitioner's household to a medical facility, to receive 2necessary medical care, to allow the petitioner to transport 3himself or herself to and from alcohol or drug remedial or 4rehabilitative activity recommended by a licensed service 5provider, or to allow the petitioner to transport himself or 6herself or a family member of the petitioner's household to 7classes, as a student, at an accredited educational 8institution, or to allow the petitioner to transport children, 9elderly persons, or persons with disabilities who do not hold 10driving privileges and are living in the petitioner's 11household to and from day care daycare. The petitioner must 12demonstrate that no alternative means of transportation is 13reasonably available and that the petitioner will not endanger 14the public safety or welfare.15        (A) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 16    suspended due to 2 or more convictions of violating 17    Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a 18    local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense, or 19    Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 20    Code of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 21    recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 22    out-of-state offense, or a combination of these offenses, 23    arising out of separate occurrences, that person, if 24    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a 25    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 26    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.  HB4382 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        (B) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 2    suspended 2 or more times due to any combination of:3            (i) a single conviction of violating Section 4        11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 5        ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense or Section 6        9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 7        of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 8        recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 9        out-of-state offense; or10            (ii) a statutory summary suspension or revocation 11        under Section 11-501.1; or12            (iii) a suspension under Section 6-203.1; 13    arising out of separate occurrences; that person, if 14    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a 15    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 16    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.17        (B-5) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 18    suspended due to a conviction for a violation of 19    subparagraph (C) or (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) 20    of Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a 21    local ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, that 22    person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not 23    operate a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an 24    ignition interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1. 25        (C) The person issued a permit conditioned upon the 26    use of an ignition interlock device must pay to the   HB4382 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    Secretary of State DUI Administration Fund an amount not 2    to exceed $30 per month. The Secretary shall establish by 3    rule the amount and the procedures, terms, and conditions 4    relating to these fees.5        (D) If the restricted driving permit is issued for 6    employment purposes, then the prohibition against 7    operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an 8    ignition interlock device does not apply to the operation 9    of an occupational vehicle owned or leased by that 10    person's employer when used solely for employment 11    purposes. For any person who, within a 5-year period, is 12    convicted of a second or subsequent offense under Section 13    11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a local 14    ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, this employment 15    exemption does not apply until either a one-year period 16    has elapsed during which that person had his or her 17    driving privileges revoked or a one-year period has 18    elapsed during which that person had a restricted driving 19    permit which required the use of an ignition interlock 20    device on every motor vehicle owned or operated by that 21    person.22        (E) In each case the Secretary may issue a restricted 23    driving permit for a period deemed appropriate, except 24    that all permits shall expire no later than 2 years from 25    the date of issuance. A restricted driving permit issued 26    under this Section shall be subject to cancellation,   HB4382 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    revocation, and suspension by the Secretary of State in 2    like manner and for like cause as a driver's license 3    issued under this Code may be cancelled, revoked, or 4    suspended; except that a conviction upon one or more 5    offenses against laws or ordinances regulating the 6    movement of traffic shall be deemed sufficient cause for 7    the revocation, suspension, or cancellation of a 8    restricted driving permit. The Secretary of State may, as 9    a condition to the issuance of a restricted driving 10    permit, require the applicant to participate in a 11    designated driver remedial or rehabilitative program. The 12    Secretary of State is authorized to cancel a restricted 13    driving permit if the permit holder does not successfully 14    complete the program.15        (F) A person subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 16    of subsection (b) of Section 6-208 of this Code may make 17    application for a restricted driving permit at a hearing 18    conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code after the 19    expiration of 5 years from the effective date of the most 20    recent revocation or after 5 years from the date of 21    release from a period of imprisonment resulting from a 22    conviction of the most recent offense, whichever is later, 23    provided the person, in addition to all other requirements 24    of the Secretary, shows by clear and convincing evidence: 25            (i) a minimum of 3 years of uninterrupted 26        abstinence from alcohol and the unlawful use or   HB4382 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1        consumption of cannabis under the Cannabis Control 2        Act, a controlled substance under the Illinois 3        Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating compound 4        under the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or 5        methamphetamine under the Methamphetamine Control and 6        Community Protection Act; and7            (ii) the successful completion of any 8        rehabilitative treatment and involvement in any 9        ongoing rehabilitative activity that may be 10        recommended by a properly licensed service provider 11        according to an assessment of the person's alcohol or 12        drug use under Section 11-501.01 of this Code. 13        In determining whether an applicant is eligible for a 14    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F), the 15    Secretary may consider any relevant evidence, including, 16    but not limited to, testimony, affidavits, records, and 17    the results of regular alcohol or drug tests. Persons 18    subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection (b) 19    of Section 6-208 of this Code and who have been convicted 20    of more than one violation of paragraph (3), paragraph 21    (4), or paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 11-501 22    of this Code shall not be eligible to apply for a 23    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F). 24        A restricted driving permit issued under this 25    subparagraph (F) shall provide that the holder may only 26    operate motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock   HB4382 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1    device as required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) 2    of Section 6-205 of this Code and subparagraph (A) of 3    paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of this Section. The 4    Secretary may revoke a restricted driving permit or amend 5    the conditions of a restricted driving permit issued under 6    this subparagraph (F) if the holder operates a vehicle 7    that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device, or 8    for any other reason authorized under this Code. 9        A restricted driving permit issued under this 10    subparagraph (F) shall be revoked, and the holder barred 11    from applying for or being issued a restricted driving 12    permit in the future, if the holder is convicted of a 13    violation of Section 11-501 of this Code, a similar 14    provision of a local ordinance, or a similar offense in 15    another state. 16    (c-3) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 17subsection (a), reports received by the Secretary of State 18under this Section shall, except during the actual time the 19suspension is in effect, be privileged information and for use 20only by the courts, police officers, prosecuting authorities, 21the driver licensing administrator of any other state, the 22Secretary of State, or the parent or legal guardian of a driver 23under the age of 18. However, beginning January 1, 2008, if the 24person is a CDL holder, the suspension shall also be made 25available to the driver licensing administrator of any other 26state, the U.S. Department of Transportation, and the affected   HB4382 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1driver or motor carrier or prospective motor carrier upon 2request. 3    (c-4) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 4subsection (a), the Secretary of State shall notify the person 5by mail that his or her driving privileges and driver's 6license will be suspended one month after the date of the 7mailing of the notice. 8    (c-5) The Secretary of State may, as a condition of the 9reissuance of a driver's license or permit to an applicant 10whose driver's license or permit has been suspended before he 11or she reached the age of 21 years pursuant to any of the 12provisions of this Section, require the applicant to 13participate in a driver remedial education course and be 14retested under Section 6-109 of this Code.15    (d) This Section is subject to the provisions of the 16Driver License Compact.17    (e) The Secretary of State shall not issue a restricted 18driving permit to a person under the age of 16 years whose 19driving privileges have been suspended or revoked under any 20provisions of this Code.21    (f) In accordance with 49 CFR 384, the Secretary of State 22may not issue a restricted driving permit for the operation of 23a commercial motor vehicle to a person holding a CDL whose 24driving privileges have been suspended, revoked, cancelled, or 25disqualified under any provisions of this Code.26(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25;   HB4382 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 16369 LNS 29756 b1103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-400, eff. 6-1-26; revised 210-27-25.) 3    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 4changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 5that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 6represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 7not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 8made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 9Public Act. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2027.